North Dakota, session 69, HB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-34-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-34-04. Eligibility - Application for assistance.
Applicants with livestock water supply problems caused by drought may apply for assistance from
the program. An applicant must first apply for water cost-share assistance from the United States
department of agriculture farm service agency. If cost-share assistance is denied by the agency, the
applicant may forward the application to the commission for consideration. An application forwarded to
the commission must include a document from the United States department of agriculture farm service
agency stating the reason for denial of cost-share assistance. The department of water resources shall
review all applications received by the commission. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a water
supply project commenced after application for funding is made but without prior approval of the
department is eligible for funding consideration from the program. The department shall provide funds
for approved applications in accordance with rules and criteria for eligibility and only to the extent that
funding is available. A drought disaster livestock water assistance program project located on Indian
land is eligible for the program.

H. B. NO. 1040 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1040.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State